California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 53, Sec. 12.   (AB 173)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

104.4.

Whenever the right of occupancy of any person upon national forest or national park lands is terminated because of the proposed construction of a state highway across such lands, the department shall, in connection with the construction of the highway, acquire, by purchase or condemnation, any buildings or improvements constructed upon such lands by the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2173.)
-------------------------------------------

104.5.

The director may execute all deeds or conveyances necessary to convey any real property or interest therein to be sold or exchanged under the provisions of this code. He may insert in any such deed or conveyance such conditions, covenants, exceptions and reservations as in his opinion are in the public interest or may convey in fee simple absolute. All statutes relating to State lands or to reservations of minerals therein or to reservations of rights to prospect for or mine or remove such minerals are inapplicable to lands heretofore or hereafter acquired by the State or conveyed by the State pursuant to the provisions of this code or pursuant to the provisions of previously
 existing statutes codified in this code, and no such statute in respect to State lands hereafter enacted shall be applicable thereto unless the Legislature expressly so declares.

It shall be conclusively presumed in favor of any purchaser for value and without notice of any real property or interest therein conveyed pursuant to the provisions of this code that the department acted within its lawful authority in acquiring the property, and that the director acted within his lawful authority in executing any deed or conveyance or lease authorized by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 686.)
-------------------------------------------

104.6.

The authority conferred by this code to acquire real property for state highway purposes includes authority to acquire for future needs. Structures maintained or allowed to remain on property which has been acquired, or is acquired in the future, for future highway needs shall be maintained in conformance with standards established in the building and safety ordinances of the city or county having jurisdiction. The standards to which such structure shall be made to conform are those standards, except for such variances as may be applicable to the structure when acquired, of the city or county having jurisdiction which are in effect at the time of acquisition by the
 department.

The department is authorized to lease any lands which are held for state highway purposes and are not presently needed therefor on such terms and conditions as the director may fix and to maintain and care for such property in order to secure rent therefrom. Except for any rent required under the California Toll Bridge Authority Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 30000) of Division 17), or any bond indenture executed under that act, to be deposited in some other fund, all such rent shall be deposited to the credit of the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund. Twenty-four percent of such rent in the State Highway Account shall be allocated pursuant to Section 104.10.

Whenever it is determined by the department that any rental revenue collected under this section represents overpayment or payment in duplicate, the department may make refund of such overpayment or payment in duplicate from the
 State Highway Account.

Any reference in any law or regulation to the Highway Properties Rental Fund or to the Highway Properties Rental Account in the Transportation Tax Fund shall be deemed to refer to the State Highway Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

104.7.

(a) Unless otherwise provided by statute, when requested by a city, county, or special district, the department shall provide information regarding, and shall lease, unoccupied, unimproved property that is held for future highway purposes to the city, county, or special district within which the property is located. The city, county, or special district may use the leased property first for agricultural and community garden purposes, and second for recreational purposes, on terms and conditions not unreasonably inhibiting the use of the
 property, including, but not limited to, assumption of liability and installation and removal of improvements. The lease shall be for one dollar ($1) per year for not less than one year and shall be renewable.

The city, county, or special district may sublease the property for agricultural or recreational purposes upon prior written notification to the department, and may proceed with the sublease unless disapproved by the department within 10 working days after the notice is sent to the department. The first priority for a sublease shall be given to the owner of property contiguous to the leased land.

In a sublease of the property, the city, county, or special district may charge rental fees at least sufficient to pay its administrative costs. All money received by the city, county, or special district under a sublease, less administrative costs, shall be transmitted to the department for deposit in the State Highway
 Account.

(b) Unoccupied, unimproved property that has commercial, industrial, or residential use as its most feasible or best use, as determined by the department, is not subject to this section.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of unoccupied, unimproved property pursuant to this section serves a public purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 336.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

104.8.

The department may retain in its records all deeds, conveyances, and other evidences of title to or interests in real property acquired by the department under the provisions of this code. The Secretary of State and any other State officer or department having custody of any such documents is authorized and directed to deliver custody of such instruments to the department. The department may furnish on demand to any person paying the cost of preparing the same a certified copy of any such document.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 199.)
-------------------------------------------

104.9.

None of the deeds, conveyances or other evidences of title to or interests in real property acquired by the department under the provisions of this code for highway purposes, need be recorded by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

104.10.

The Department of Transportation shall, not later than the first day of November following the close of any fiscal year, pay the rents computed pursuant to Section 104.6 to the county in which such real property is situated. The Department of Transportation shall certify to the Department of Finance the amount of such rentals attributable to each county and shall notify each county of the rental and location of each piece of rental property for which rents are deposited in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

The county auditor shall distribute any payment received by the county pursuant to this section, to
 the county, to each revenue district for which the county assesses and collects real property taxes or assessments, and to every other taxing agency within the county in which the property is situated in the amount as determined by the board of supervisors, except that one-half of the allocation for a rental property shall be allocated to the city in which the rental property is located.

As used in this section, the terms “taxing agency” and “revenue district” have the same meanings given them in the Revenue and Taxation Code.

The money received by the respective jurisdictions under this section shall be expended only for purposes authorized by Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

104.11.

(a) Upon a finding that the action would not adversely affect the activities of the department, the department may lease, in whole or in part, property owned by it in the block bounded by First Street, Main Street, Second Street, and Los Angeles Street in the City of Los Angeles to public agencies or private entities for any term not to exceed 99 years. Each lease shall be subject to reservations, restrictions, and conditions as the department deems appropriate. Prior to entering into a lease, the department shall determine that the proposed lease is not in conflict with local zoning ordinances. The lease may provide for joint use of
 the property by the department. Each lease shall be subject to prior approval by the commission.

(b) Revenues from leases shall be deposited in the State Highway Account.

(c) The department shall act as agent for the payment of its tenant’s possessory interest tax in accordance with the procedures of Section 104.13.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1060, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

104.12.

(a) The department may lease to public agencies or private entities for any term not to exceed 99 years the use of areas above or below state highways, subject to any reservations, restrictions, and conditions that it deems necessary to ensure adequate protection to the safety and the adequacy of highway facilities and to abutting or adjacent land uses. Authorized emergency vehicles, as defined in Section 165 of the Vehicle Code, which are on active duty and are not merely being stored, shall be given preference in the use of these areas, and
 no payment of consideration shall be required for this use of the areas by these vehicles. Prior to entering into any lease, the department shall determine that the proposed use is not in conflict with the zoning regulations of the local government concerned. The leases shall be made in accordance with procedures to be prescribed by the commission, except that, in the case of leases with private entities, the leases shall only be made after competitive bidding unless the commission finds, by unanimous vote, that in certain cases competitive bidding would not be in the best interests of the state. The possibilities of entering into the leases, and the consequent benefits to be derived therefrom, may be considered by the department in designing and constructing the highways.

Revenues from the leases shall be deposited in the State Highway Account. If leased property was provided to the department for state highway purposes through donation or at less than fair market
 value, the lease revenues shall be shared with the donor or seller if so provided by contract when the property was acquired. If the donor or seller was a local agency which no longer exists at the time the department enters into the lease, the local agency’s share of lease revenues shall be paid to the county or counties within which the local agency was situated.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in any case where sufficient land or airspace exists within the right-of-way of any highway, constructed in whole or in part with federal-aid highway funds, to accommodate needed passenger, commuter, or high-speed rail, magnetic levitation systems, and highway and nonhighway public mass transit facilities, the department may make the land or airspace available, with or without charge, to a public entity for those purposes, subject to any reservations, restrictions, or conditions that it determines necessary to ensure adequate protection to the
 safety and adequacy of highway facilities and to abutting or adjacent land uses.

(c) The department shall consider future lease potential of areas above or below state highway projects when planning new state highway projects. This consideration shall be accomplished by intradepartment consultation between offices concerned with project development and airspace lease development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 860, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

104.13.

(a) The department shall act as agent for the payment of possessory interest taxes due from persons to whom the department leases property of a type described in subdivision (e).

(b) The department shall annually provide a current list of all such property located in each county to the assessor of the county. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the assessor shall submit the possessory interest tax bill for each property directly to the department, and the department shall be responsible for the payment of the tax in the manner described in subdivision (c).

(c) All funds distributed to a county pursuant to Section 104.10 shall be deemed to be in full or partial payment on the total possessory interest taxes due on the property described in subdivision (e) located in the county. If the amount transferred to a county pursuant to Section 104.10 in any year is less than the total possessory interest tax due on all the property located in the county, the department shall promptly forward to the county the amount of the balance due.

(d) In lieu of the information required by Section 107.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all leases of property of a type described in subdivision (e) shall contain a statement that the department will pay all possessory interest taxes arising from the lease and that the amount of rent charged reflects the cost of this added responsibility of the department.

(e) This section shall apply only to real property held for future state highway needs and to real property originally held for that purpose, which the department has determined is no longer needed for that purpose, prior to its sale or exchange by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 213, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

104.15.

Whenever land has been acquired pursuant to former Section 104.1 or pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 1240.410) of Chapter 3 of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the department may, in its discretion, lease to a local agency for park purposes all or any portion of the remainder outside the boundary of the state highway or public work or improvement, but not beyond the next adjacent dedicated street, when such use will protect such highway, public work, or improvement and its environs, and will preserve its view, appearance, light, air, and usefulness. Such lease shall be made in accordance with procedures, terms, and conditions to be prescribed
 by the commission. Such terms and conditions shall include all of the following:

(a) Provisions requiring the local agency to develop and maintain such portion of the remainder as a park.

(b) Provisions that whenever such portion of the remainder is needed for state highway purposes, the lease shall terminate.

(c) Provisions that whenever such portion of the remainder ceases to be used for park purposes, the lease shall terminate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

104.16.

(a) Any airspace under a freeway, or real property acquired for highway purposes, in the City and County of San Francisco, that is not excess property, shall be offered for lease on a right of first refusal by the department to the city and county or a political subdivision of the city and county, for purposes of an emergency shelter or feeding program, or for park, recreational, or open-space purposes.

(b) (1) The lease amount for emergency shelter or feeding programs shall be for one dollar ($1) per month.

(2) For up to 10 parcels, the lease amount for park, recreational, or
 open-space purposes shall be 30 percent of the fair market lease value of the applicable parcel.

(3) Any property leased pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be located within a priority development area.

(4) The lease amount may be paid in advance of the term covered in order to reduce the administrative costs associated with the payment of the monthly rental fee. The lease shall require the payment of an administrative fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year, unless the department determines that a higher administrative fee is necessary, for the department’s cost of administering the lease.

(c) In the case of a lease for park, recreational, or open-space purposes, in order to offset any potential loss of revenue, the department may include parcels leased pursuant to this section in a mitigation bank to be used to advance future development projects or highway projects within the city and county.

(d) The city and county or a political subdivision of the city and county, in consultation with the department, shall follow all applicable health, environmental, safety, design, and engineering standards.

(e) Any lease shall require the lessee to fund and construct all associated infrastructure, and to accept full responsibility for liability related to those uses. The lease shall require the lessee to be responsible
 for all maintenance costs associated with those uses, except as otherwise provided in the lease. The lease shall authorize the lessee to subsidize its associated maintenance costs through generation of revenue under a limited revenue generation model, such as from limited parking facilities located on the leased property, if any revenues generated that exceed the associated maintenance costs are shared with the state, at a rate not less than 50 percent of those excess revenues, with that amount to be deposited in the State Highway Account.

(f) As used in this section, “priority development area” means an area identified in a sustainable communities strategy developed pursuant to Section 65080 of the Government Code.

(g) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of real property
 pursuant to this section serves a public purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 822, Sec. 1.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

104.17.

(a) The department may provide information regarding, and may lease, airspace under the interchange of Route 4 and Route 5 in San Joaquin County and on the northeast corner of Route 101 and De La Vina Street in the County of Santa Barbara, to a city, county, or other political subdivision or another state agency for emergency shelter or feeding program purposes. The lease shall be for one dollar ($1) per month. The lease amount may be paid in advance of the term covered in order to reduce the administrative costs associated with the payment of the monthly rental fee.

(b) Notwithstanding
 Chapter 7.8 (commencing with Section 8698) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any structure that is constructed or modified under this section shall comply with the minimum standards provided in Appendix N of the 2016 California Building Code or Appendix X of the 2016 California Residential Code, or any future standards adopted by the Department of Housing and Community Development related to emergency housing or emergency housing facilities.

(c) A lease executed pursuant to this section shall also provide for the cost of administering the lease.

(d) The administrative fee shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year unless the department determines that a higher administrative fee is necessary.

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of real property pursuant to this section serves a public purpose.

(f) A lease executed pursuant to subdivision (a) for airspace under the interchange of Route 4 and Route 5 in San Joaquin County shall provide for the rescission of existing leases of this airspace between the department and the City of Stockton. Upon the request of the City of Stockton, the department may renew the lease executed pursuant to subdivision (a) for the airspace described in this subdivision for the period requested by the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   (AB 2629)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

104.18.

(a) Real property in the City of San Diego between 17th Street and the west side of Route 5 between the southbound onramp and the offramp near J Street, which was acquired for highway purposes and which is not excess property, may be leased by the department to a city, county, or other political subdivision or another state agency for emergency shelter, feeding program purposes, or for the establishment of a day care center for children.

(b) The lease shall be for one dollar
 ($1) per month. The lease amount may be paid in advance of the term covered in order to reduce the administrative costs associated with the payment of the monthly rental fee. The lease shall require the payment of an administrative fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year, unless the department determines that a higher administrative fee is necessary, for the department’s cost of administering the lease.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of real property pursuant to this section serves a public purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 15.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

104.19.

(a) The excess property owned by the department described in subdivision (b) that is leased until June 30, 2005, to the Century Housing Corporation, a nonprofit corporation, and used for job training and placement purposes, shall continue to be leased to that party until June 30, 2028, at the existing rent.

(b) The excess property consists of approximately 1.3 acres, is referred to as excess parcels 6160, 6166, 6167, and 6168, and is located adjacent to Lennox Boulevard and State
 Highway (Interstate) Route 405 in an unincorporated area of Los Angeles County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 228, Sec. 51.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

104.21.

(a) (1) The department may lease airspace under the interchange of Route 4 and Sutter Street in San Joaquin County to any city, county, or other political subdivision, or any state agency, for feeding program purposes. The department may provide information to those entities regarding the lease of that airspace for that use. Property may be leased under this section only if there is no buyer for the property. The lease shall be for one dollar ($1) per month. The lease amount may be paid in advance of the term covered in
 order to reduce the administrative costs associated with the payment of the monthly rental fee.

(2) Any lease executed under this section shall also provide for the cost of administering the lease. The administrative fee shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year unless the department determines that a higher administrative fee is necessary.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of real property under this section serves a public purpose.

(c) Upon the request of the City of Stockton, the department may renew the lease for the period requested by the city, but not to exceed 10 years, and may, subsequent to that renewal, agree to not more than two additional renewals of not more than 10 years each.

(d) This section shall become
 operative on July 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 958, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

104.22.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Transportation shall, consistent with Article XIX of the California Constitution, transfer to the Department of Parks and Recreation the real property in the City of San Diego between Taylor Street and Wallace Street and between Juan Street and Calhoun Street, which was acquired for highway purposes and which was previously used by the department as its District 11 administrative headquarters, and which is commonly known as 2829 Juan Street, San Diego.

(b) The real property transferred pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be incorporated into the state park system upon its transfer to the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(c) On and after the date of transfer, the Department of Transportation shall have no continuing obligation relating to the ownership, maintenance, or control of the transferred real property, and all obligations of ownership, maintenance, and control shall thereafter be borne by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(d) The transfer of the real property required by this section shall be completed within 90 days of the effective date of the act enacting this section in the 2013–14 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(e) The transfer of the real property required by this section serves a public purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 51.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

104.23.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall declare that the Pedro Point excess property identified in Director’s Deed DD–028801–01–01, also known as the “Disney Lot,” is surplus state property acquired by the expenditure of tax revenues and located in the coastal zone, pursuant to Section 10 of Article XIX of the California Constitution. The department shall provide for the transfer of this property to the Department of Parks and Recreation for state park purposes as provided under Section 10 of Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(b) The
 transfer of the property required by this section serves a public purpose. 

(c) For purposes of the transfer required by this section, the value of the property shall be the price paid by the department for the original acquisition of the property. The original acquisition price shall not be adjusted for inflation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 365, Sec. 3.   (AB 1937)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

104.24.

(a) Any airspace under a freeway, or real property acquired for highway purposes, in the City of Oakland, that is not excess property, may be offered for lease on a right of first refusal by the department to the city, or to a political subdivision of the city, for purposes of an emergency shelter or feeding program.

(b) For up to 10 parcels, the lease amount for emergency shelter or feeding programs shall be for one dollar ($1) per month. The lease amount may be paid in advance of the term covered in order
 to reduce the administrative costs associated with the payment of the monthly rental fee. The lease shall require the payment of an administrative fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year, unless the department determines that a higher administrative fee is necessary, for the department’s cost of administering the lease.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of real property pursuant to this section serves a public purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (AB 3139)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

104.25.

(a) The department may lease the real property located at 4747 Pacific Highway in the City of San Diego, department parcel number 760-216-19-00, which was acquired for highway purposes and is not excess property, to a city or county, a political subdivision of a city or county, or another state agency, for purposes of an emergency shelter or feeding program.

(b) (1) The lease amount shall be for one dollar ($1) per month.

(2) The lease amount may be paid in advance of the term covered to reduce the administrative costs associated with the payment of the monthly rental fee.

(3) The lease shall
 require the payment of an administrative fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year, unless the department determines that a higher administrative fee is necessary, for the department’s cost of administering the lease.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of real property pursuant to this section serves a public purpose.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 7.8 (commencing with Section 8698) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, all structures that are constructed or modified under this section shall be compliant with the minimum standards provided in the 2016 California Building Code Appendix N, the 2016 California Residential Code Appendix X, or any future standards adopted by the Department of Housing and Community Development related to emergency housing or emergency housing facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   (AB 3061)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

104.26.

(a) (1) Any airspace under a freeway, or real property acquired for highway purposes, in the City of Los Angeles, that is not excess property, may be offered for lease on a right of first refusal by the department to the city, or to a political subdivision of the city, for purposes of an emergency shelter or feeding program, for purposes of a secure vehicle lot program, or for any combination of these purposes.

(2) For up to 25 parcels, the lease amount for emergency shelter or feeding programs or secure vehicle lot programs shall be for one dollar ($1) per month. The lease amount may be paid in advance of the term covered in order to reduce the
 administrative costs associated with the payment of the monthly rental fee. The lease shall require the payment of an administrative fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year, unless the department determines that a higher administrative fee is necessary, for the department’s cost of administering the lease.

(3) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of real property pursuant to this subdivision serves a public purpose.

(b) (1) Any airspace under a freeway, or real property acquired for highway purposes, in the City of San Jose, that is not excess property, may be offered for lease on a right of first refusal by the department to the city, or to a political subdivision of the city, for purposes of an emergency shelter or feeding program.

(2) For up to 10 parcels, the lease amount for emergency shelter or feeding programs shall be for one dollar ($1) per month. The lease amount may be paid in advance of the term covered in order to reduce the administrative costs associated with the payment of the monthly rental fee. The lease shall require the payment of an administrative fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year, unless the department determines that a higher administrative fee is necessary, for the department’s cost of administering the lease.

(3) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of real property pursuant to this subdivision serves a public purpose.

(c) A vehicle stored in a secure vehicle lot program
 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall comply with all of the following:

(1) It shall be uninhabited.

(2) Prior to storage in a secure vehicle lot program, it shall be assessed for safe storage, as defined by the department and in consultation with the City of Los Angeles.

(3) It shall not contain hazardous material, as defined in Section 25501 of the Health and Safety Code, unless otherwise specified in the terms of the lease entered into between the City of Los Angeles and the department.

(d) For purposes of this section, “secure vehicle lot program” means the use of the leased property to store a vehicle, including, but not limited to, a recreational vehicle, belonging to a person receiving services from the lessee or other governmental agency for the purpose of relieving homelessness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   (AB 2525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

104.30.

(a) The department may make available for lease airspace or real property for the purposes described in this section if it determines that the airspace or real property is available for rent and that the airspace or real property has independent site access separate from an access-controlled highway or highway structure. The department may offer the airspace or real property for lease to a local or state agency for the purpose of conducting a temporary emergency shelter or feeding program. As a condition of entering into the lease, the lessee shall agree that, during the period of the lease, the airspace or real property and its improvements shall not be used as childcare facilities and that no playground equipment shall be permitted under the lease. Any existing lease of airspace or real property between
 the department and a local or state agency may be terminated without penalty at any time, upon mutual agreement of both the department and the lessee, for the purpose of entering into a new lease pursuant to this section.

(b) The determination of availability and identification of specific parcels of airspace or real property eligible for lease under this section shall be made by the department in its sole discretion.

(c) All structures that are constructed or modified under this section shall be compliant with the minimum standards adopted pursuant to Chapter 7.8 (commencing with Section 8698) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code or the minimum standards provided in the 2019 California Building Code Appendix O, the 2019 California Residential Code Appendix X, and any future standards adopted by the Department of Housing and Community Development related to emergency
 housing or emergency housing facilities.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, for any leases executed pursuant to this section or any other section by the department for the purpose of conducting a temporary emergency shelter or feeding program, the enforcement of applicable building standards adopted pursuant to Chapter 7.8 (commencing with Section 8698) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code or published in the California Building Code and the California Residential Code, including those relating to fire and panic safety, and any future standards adopted by the Department of Housing and Community Development related to emergency housing or emergency housing facilities, shall be the responsibility of the local authority in which the property subject to the lease is located and that has jurisdiction over the enforcement of building code standards.

(e) Any improvements to
 the leased property shall meet the following conditions:

(1) No improvements of a permanent nature are allowed, except for appropriate utilities, groundcover, lighting, and fencing to support the temporary emergency shelter or feeding program as approved by the department.

(2) Any improvements of a temporary nature in which people live, eat, recreate, receive services, or otherwise occupy shall not be underneath a transportation structure, and shall not be within 20 horizontal feet from the farthest edge of a transportation structure.

(f) (1) The monthly rent of a lease entered into pursuant to this section shall be one dollar ($1) per month. The lessee may pay the rental amounts due for the entire term of the lease in advance of the term covered in order to reduce the administrative costs
 associated with the payment of the monthly rental fee.

(2) To cover the department’s costs, the lease shall require the lessee to pay an annual administrative fee of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), unless the department determines that a higher administrative fee is necessary to cover the department’s costs, in which case the annual administrative fee shall be no more than the amount of those costs, not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(3) (A) If the department determines at any time after the commencement of the lease that the leased property is needed for departmental purposes, the department may terminate the lease without penalty or reimbursement of prior lease payments made to the department, except that the department shall reimburse any advance lease payments and fees made to the department on a prorated basis.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, if the department terminates the lease pursuant to subparagraph (A), neither the lessee nor any occupants of the leased property shall be entitled to relocation benefits or reimbursement of relocation expenses payable by the department or the state as result of that termination.

(C) The department shall provide the lessee with no less than 120 days’ written notice before the termination of a lease entered into pursuant to this section, except in the case of an emergency.

(4) The lessee shall defend, indemnify, and hold the state, its officers, officials, employees, agents, and volunteers harmless from any and all losses, claims, injuries, damages, suits, obligations, penalties, judgments, awards, and other liabilities including attorney fees, whether caused by, relating to, based upon,
 arising out of, or in connection with the performance of the lease, the temporary emergency shelter, or the feeding program.

(5) The lessee shall be responsible for all leased area site conditions, including, but not limited to, maintenance, litter and graffiti abatement, security, environmental testing and remediation for purposes of the lease, and other legal and permitting requirements at the leased site, as required by the department.

(g) The Legislature finds and declares that the lease of airspace or real property pursuant to this section serves a public purpose. The Legislature further finds and declares that the rental amount established in subdivision (f) constitutes fair market value for the leased airspace or real property.

(h) For purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13
 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), the lessee is the lead agency for any action undertaken pursuant to this section.

(i) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d), this section does not apply to a lease that a local or state agency enters into with the department pursuant to Section 104.16, 104.17, 104.18, 104.21, 104.24, 104.25, or 104.26. 

(2) A local or state agency described in Section 104.16, 104.17, 104.18, 104.21, 104.24, 104.25, or 104.26 may enter into a lease with the department pursuant to this section.

(j) For purposes of this section, “local agency” means a city, county, or political subdivision of a city or county.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 343, Sec. 1.   (SB 211)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

The department may construct and maintain stock trails approximately paralleling any State highway and may retain and maintain for stock trails the right of way of any State highway which is superseded by relocation.

The department may likewise designate as a stock trail any highway which the State has relinquished to a county and which approximately parallels any State highway. Where such a highway has been so designated as a stock trail, it thereafter may not be abandoned or vacated without the consent in writing of the department filed with the board of supervisors.

The department shall
 post notices upon such stock trails, and upon each highway at the entrances of such trails, directing all persons to drive all untethered stock thereon.

Any person who drives any untethered stock upon any State highway between the entrances of such a stock trail is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, in addition, thereto, is liable for all damage thereby done to said highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 264.)
-------------------------------------------

106.
